Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1469.07
Businesses and organizations; separate segregated political fund; status.

A separate segregated political fund is hereby declared to be an independent committee and subject to all of the provisions of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act applicable to independent committees, and the corporation, labor organization, or industry, trade, or professional association which establishes and administers such fund shall make the reports and filings required therefor.

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 22.